West Virginia, session 2025, HB2864.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS’ ASSISTANCE. §9A-1-17. Posting of information.(a) The West Virginia Division of Labor shall consult with the West Virginia Department of Veterans' Assistance to create and distribute a veterans' benefits and services poster.  The poster, at a minimum, shall include contact information and a description regarding the following resources for veterans:(1) West Virginia Department of Veterans' Assistance;(2) Substance abuse and mental health treatment;(3) Education, workforce, and training;(4) Tax benefits;(5) West Virginia drivers' licenses and identification cards;(6) Eligibility for unemployment insurance benefits under state and federal law;(7) Legal services; and(8) United States Department of Veterans Affairs' Veterans Crisis Line.(b) Every employer in the state with more than 50 full-time employees shall display the poster in a prominent position accessible to employees in the employer's workplace and, if applicable, in a conspicuous place on their website.